Mississippi statutes. Title 79. Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act
Former
§ 79-11-379 provided for the resignation of a foreign nonprofit corporation’s registered agent. For present provisions relating to registered agents, see
§§ 79-35-1 et seq.

§79-11-381.
Service of process, demand or notice on foreign corporation.

Notice or demand required or permitted by law on a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state is governed by Section 79-35-13. Service of process is governed by the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 141; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 71, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote the section.

Foreign corporations, certificate of authority to transact business in state, corporate name, etc., under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-15.01 through 79-4-15.10.

Applicability of this section to time period for foreign corporation to appeal revocation of its certificate of authority, see § 79-11-389.

Federal or state law as controlling, in diversity action, whether foreign corporation is amenable to service of process in state.
6 A.L.R.3d 1103.

Who is “general” or “managing” agent of foreign corporation under statute authorizing service of process on such agent.
17 A.L.R.3d 625.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 215-219.

12 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Foreign Corporations, §§ 11 et seq.

§79-11-383.
Withdrawal of foreign corporation.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may not withdraw from this state until it obtains a certificate of withdrawal from the Secretary of State.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state may apply for a certificate of withdrawal by delivering an application to the Secretary of State for filing. The application must set forth:

The name of the foreign corporation and the name of the state or country under whose law it is incorporated;

A representation that it is not transacting business in this state and that it surrenders its authority to transact business in this state;

A representation that it revokes the authority of its registered agent to accept service on its behalf and appoints the Secretary of State as its agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action arising during the time it was authorized to do business in this state;

A mailing address to which the Secretary of State may mail a copy of any process served on him or her under paragraph (c) of this subsection; and

A commitment to notify the Secretary of State in the future of any change in the mailing address.

After the withdrawal of the corporation is effective, service of process on the Secretary of State under the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure is service on the foreign corporation. Upon receipt of process, the Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the process to the foreign corporation at the address set forth in its application for withdrawal.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 142; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 72, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (3), substituted “the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure” for “this section” and deleted “post-office” preceding “address set forth” near the end.

Withdrawal of foreign corporation under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see § 79-4-15.20.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Applicability of this section to service of process on a foreign corporation, see § 79-11-381.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 396 et seq.

§79-11-385.
Revocation of certificate of authority of foreign corporation, grounds.

The Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under Section 79-11-387 to revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state if:

The foreign corporation does not deliver the status report to the Secretary of State within sixty (60) days after it is due;

The foreign corporation does not pay within sixty (60) days after they are due any franchise taxes or penalties imposed by Section 79-11-101 et seq. or other law;

The foreign corporation is without a registered agent in this state for sixty (60) days or more;

The foreign corporation does not inform the Secretary of State by an appropriate filing that its registered agent has changed or that its registered agent has resigned within ninety (90) days of the change or resignation;

An incorporator, director, officer or agent of the foreign corporation signed a document such person knew was false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing; or

The Secretary of State receives a duly authenticated certificate from the Secretary of State or other official having custody of corporate records in the state or country under whose law the foreign corporation is incorporated stating that it has been dissolved or has disappeared as the result of a merger.

The Attorney General may commence a proceeding under Section 79-11-387 to revoke the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state if the corporation has continued to exceed or abuse the authority conferred upon it by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 143; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 73, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (1)(b) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted “a registered office” following “a registered agent” in (1)(c); and in (1)(d), deleted references to “registered office” and substituted “inform the Secretary of State by an appropriate filing” for “inform the Secretary of State under Section
79-4-15.08 or 79-4-15.09.”

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Revocation of certificate of authority under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-15.30 through 79-4-15.33.

Applicability of this section to notice requirements for issuance of revocation of certificate of authority, see § 79-11-387.

Reinstatement of repealed, forfeited, expired, or suspended corporate charter as validating interim acts of corporation.
42 A.L.R.4th 392.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 176 et seq.

12 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Foreign Corporations, Forms 31, 32.

State venue provisions for civil actions as violating equal protection clause of Federal Constitution’s Fourteenth Amendment – Supreme Court cases. 119 L. Ed. 2d 665.

§79-11-387.
Issuance of certificate of revocation.

The Secretary of State upon determining that one or more grounds exist under Section 79-11-385 for revocation of a certificate of authority shall serve the foreign corporation with written notice of that determination under Section 79-11-381.

The Attorney General upon determining that grounds exist under Section 79-11-385(2) for revocation of a certificate of authority shall request the Secretary of State to serve, and the Secretary of State shall serve the foreign corporation with written notice of that determination under Section 79-11-381.

If the foreign corporation does not correct each ground for revocation or demonstrate to the reasonable satisfaction of the Secretary of State or Attorney General that each ground for revocation determined by the Secretary of State or Attorney General does not exist within sixty (60) days after service of the notice is perfected under Section 79-11-381, the Secretary of State may revoke the foreign corporation’s certificate of authority by signing a certificate of revocation that recites the ground or grounds for revocation and its effective date. The Secretary of State shall file the original of the certificate and serve a copy on the foreign corporation under Section 79-11-381.

The authority of a foreign corporation to transact business in this state ceases on the date shown on the certificate revoking its certificate of authority.

The Secretary of State’s revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority appoints the Secretary of State the foreign corporation’s agent for service of process in any proceeding based on a cause of action which arose during the time the foreign corporation was authorized to transact business in this state. Service of process on the Secretary of State under this subsection is service on the foreign corporation. Upon receipt of process, the Secretary of State shall mail a copy of the process to the secretary of the foreign corporation at its principal office shown in its most recent status report or in any subsequent communications received from the corporation stating the current mailing address of its principal office, or, if none is on file, in its application for a certificate of authority.

Revocation of a foreign corporation’s certificate of authority does not terminate the authority of the registered agent of the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 144, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

Secretary of State generally, see §§ 7-3-1 et seq.

Attorney General generally, see §§ 7-5-1 et seq.

Revocation of certificate of authority under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-15.30 through 79-4-15.33.

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Applicability of this section to service of process on a foreign corporation, see § 79-11-381.

Grounds for revocation of certificate of authority of foreign corporation, see § 79-11-385.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 176 et seq.

12 Am. Jur. Pl & Pr Forms (Rev), Foreign Corporations, Forms 31, 32.

§79-11-389.
Appeal of revocation.

A foreign corporation may appeal the Secretary of State’s revocation of its certificate of authority to the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, or the chancery court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is located within thirty (30) days after the service of the certificate of revocation is perfected under Section 79-11-381. The foreign corporation applies by petitioning the court to set aside the revocation and attaching to the petition copies of its certificate of authority and the Secretary of State’s certificate of revocation.

The court may summarily order the Secretary of State to reinstate the certificate of authority or may take any other action the court considers appropriate.

The court’s final decision may be appealed as in other civil proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 145; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 74, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, or the chancery court of the county where the corporation’s principal office is located” for “chancery court of the county in which its registered office in this state is located” in the first sentence of (1).

Revocation of certificate of authority under Mississippi Business Corporation Act, see §§ 79-4-15.30 through 79-4-15.33.

36 Am. Jur. 2d, Foreign Corporations §§ 176 et seq.

§79-11-391.
Status report of corporation.

Each domestic corporation, and each foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, shall upon request deliver to the Secretary of State a status report on a form prescribed and furnished by the Secretary of State that sets forth:

The name of the corporation and the jurisdiction under whose law it is incorporated;

The information required by Section 79-35-5(a);

The address of its principal office;

The names and business or residence addresses of its directors and principal officers;

A brief description of the nature of its activities; and

Whether or not it has members.

Upon receiving the request for a status report, a domestic or foreign corporation shall have ninety (90) days to deliver the report to the Secretary of State.

The information in the status report must be current on the date the status report is executed on behalf of the corporation.

The Secretary of State may request a status report from time to time, but not more frequently than once every five (5) years, beginning five (5) years from the date upon which a domestic corporation was incorporated or a foreign corporation was authorized to transact business.

If a status report does not contain the information required by this section, the Secretary of State shall promptly notify the reporting domestic or foreign corporation in writing and return the report to it for correction. If the report is corrected to contain the information required by this section and delivered to the Secretary of State within thirty (30) days after the effective date of notice, it is deemed to be timely filed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 146; Laws, 1988, ch. 417, § 8; Laws, 2012, ch. 382, § 75, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2013.

The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, substituted “jurisdiction” for “state or country” in (1)(a); and rewrote, which formerly read: “The address of its registered office and the name of its registered agent at the office in this state or the address and name of the person designated as its resident agent prior to January 1, 1988.”

Filing fees, see § 79-11-109.

Requirement that corporation keep copy of most recent status report delivered to Secretary of State under this section, see § 79-11-283.

Applicability of this section to service of process on a foreign corporation, see § 79-11-381.

§79-11-393.
Rural water companies, special requirements.

Rural water companies organized pursuant to Section 79-11-101 et seq. shall be subject to the following requirements in order to obtain federal tax exemptions:

Each rural water company shall maintain a roster of all members which shall include the date upon which each member joined.

Each rural water company shall maintain a roster of patrons which shall include periodic data as to services rendered by the water company. Such roster shall be the basis for any distribution of excess revenues of the water company. Any such distribution shall be to the members and shall be based upon patronage for the time period over which such excess revenues to be distributed were collected, and the loss of membership by death or otherwise shall not terminate the rights and interest of such member in any patronage distribution due him at the termination of his membership. Any amount to be distributed shall be net income or funds in excess of those needed to meet current losses and operating expenses; provided, that such amount to be distributed shall be in excess of that needed for normal, reasonable business purposes.

Before a rural water company shall construct, operate or maintain a water transmission or distribution system for the sale of water to the public, it shall obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity from the Public Service Commission, pursuant to the provisions of Sections 77-3-1 through 77-3-87.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 147, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in the introductory language was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

§79-11-394.
Rural waterworks corporations; financial reports; contents; notice; failure to file report; notice of annual meeting.

Any nonprofit, nonshare corporation chartered under the Mississippi Nonprofit Corporation Act, Section 79-11-101 et seq., for the purpose of owning and operating rural waterworks annually shall prepare a financial report showing the financial condition of the corporation. The financial report shall be prepared on forms provided by the State Auditor within ninety (90) days following the close of the fiscal year of that corporation. Each report shall contain a certification signed by the president of the board of directors of the corporation that the president has reviewed the information contained in the financial report and that the information is true and correct.

As part of the billing statement received by the subscriber immediately before the annual meeting of the corporation, each corporation owning and operating rural waterworks shall notify each subscriber provided water service by the corporation of the availability of the most recently completed annual financial report, how that report may be obtained and where the report may be reviewed. If requested in writing, the corporation shall provide a copy of the financial report to any subscriber.

Before July 1, 1999, and July 1 of each subsequent year, each corporation required to prepare a financial report under this section shall submit the most recently completed annual financial report to the State Auditor. In addition, the corporation shall provide a copy of that financial report to the public library in the county seat of the county in which the corporation’s principal office is located. If no public library is located in the county seat, the corporation shall provide that report to the public library serving the largest population in the county of the corporation’s principal office. If requested in writing, the State Auditor shall provide a copy of the financial report to any subscriber of a water system owned and operated by that corporation and may recover the costs of providing that report.

In addition to the information required under subsection (1) of this section, each financial report shall contain the following:

A statement certifying that an annual meeting was held in accordance with the corporation’s bylaws, as required under Section 79-11-197, including the date of the most recent annual meeting;

A list of the directors currently serving on the board of the corporation; and

A list of those directors required who have failed to meet the management training requirements under Section 41-26-101.

Before July 15, 1999, and July 15 of each subsequent year, the State Auditor shall provide the State Department of Health a list of all corporations failing to file a report as required under subsection (1) of this section. The State Department of Health shall notify the president of the board of directors of each listed system in writing and shall require that the financial report be submitted to the State Auditor within thirty (30) days after the date of the letter.

If any corporation required to prepare a financial report under this section fails to notify subscribers of the availability of the financial report, no corporate action taken after the date of the annual meeting shall be valid. If any corporation required to prepare a financial report under this section fails to submit the most recently completed annual financial report to the State Auditor, no corporate action taken after the date for submission specified in the letter from the State Department of Health, as required under paragraph (a) of this subsection, shall be valid.

Each nonprofit, nonshare corporation chartered under Section 79-11-101 et seq. for the purpose of owning and operating rural waterworks shall mail to each subscriber provided water service by the corporation, as part of the billing statement received by the subscriber immediately before the annual meeting of the corporation, a notice of the annual meeting of the corporation. Each corporation also shall submit, at the time the notice is provided to the subscribers, a copy of that notice to the State Department of Health.

If any corporation fails to provide notice as required under this subsection, no corporate action taken after the date stated in or fixed in accordance with the corporation’s bylaws for the annual meeting shall be valid.

If any nonprofit, nonshare corporation chartered under Section 79-11-101 et seq. for the purpose of owning and operating rural waterworks fails to hold an annual meeting, no corporate action taken after the date stated in or fixed in accordance with the corporation’s bylaws for the annual meeting shall be valid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1998, ch. 569, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

Section 7-7-2 provides that the words “State Auditor of Public Accounts,” “State Auditor” and “Auditor” appearing in the laws of this state in connection with the performance of the Auditor’s functions shall mean the State Fiscal Officer whenever they appear.
Section 27-104-6 provides that wherever the term “State Fiscal Officer” appears in any law it shall mean “Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.”

§79-11-395.
Application to pre-existing domestic nonprofit, nonshare corporations.

Section 79-11-101 et seq. apply to all domestic nonprofit, nonshare corporations in existence on its effective date that were incorporated under Section 79-11-1 or any predecessor thereto.

HISTORY:
Laws of 1987, ch. 485, § 148, eff from and after January 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in the section was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Former
§ 79-11-1, referred to in this section, was repealed by Laws of 1987, ch. 485, § 153 eff from and after January 1, 1988.

§79-11-397.
Application to pre-existing foreign corporations authorized to transact business.

A foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state on January 1, 1988, Section 79-11-101 et seq. is subject to Section 79-11-101 et seq. but is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under Section 79-11-101 et seq.

A foreign corporation domesticated in this state on January 1, 1988, is subject to Section 79-11-101 et seq., and its status shall automatically change from a foreign corporation domesticated in this state to that of a foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this state, and such corporation is not required to obtain a new certificate of authority to transact business under Section 79-11-101 et seq.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 149; Laws, 1988, ch. 417, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

In 2009, typographical errors in subsections (1) and (2) were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

§79-11-399.
Effect of repeal of prior statutes.

Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, the repeal of a statute by Section 79-11-101 et seq. does not affect:

The operation of the statute or any action taken under it before its repeal;

Any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation or liability acquired, accrued or incurred under the statute before its repeal;

Any violation of the statute or any penalty, forfeiture or punishment incurred because of the violation before its repeal;

Any proceeding, reorganization or dissolution commenced under the statute before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization or dissolution may be completed in accordance with the statute as if it had not been repealed; or

Any meeting of members or directors or action by written consent noticed or any action taken before its repeal as a result of a meeting of members or directors or action by written consent.

If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a statute repealed by Section 79-11-101 et seq. is reduced by Section 79-11-101 et seq., the penalty or punishment, if not already imposed, shall be imposed in accordance with Section 79-11-101 et seq.

This chapter modifies, limits, or supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 USC Section 7001 et seq., but this chapter does not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 485, § 150; Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 18, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

In 2009, typographical errors in subsections (1) and (2) were corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

The 2011 amendment, effective January 1, 2012, added (3).

Sections 101(c) and 103(b) of the federal Electronic Signature in Global and National Commerce Act, see 15 USCS §§ 7001(c) and 7003(b), respectively.

§79-11-401.
Application to religious corporations.

Except as may be otherwise provided in Sections 79-11-31, 79-11-33 and 79-11-403, Section 79-11-101 et seq. apply to religious corporations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 417, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in the section was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

§79-11-403.
Certain provisions inapplicable to religious corporations; religious doctrine controlling in case of inconsistencies.

The following provisions shall not apply to religious corporations unless otherwise provided in their articles or bylaws:

Section 79-11-133

Section 79-11-189

Section 79-11-193

Section 79-11-213

Section 79-11-239

Section 79-11-245

Section 79-11-282

Section 79-11-359

If religious doctrine governing the affairs of a religious corporation is inconsistent with the provisions of Section 79-11-101 et seq. on the same subject, the religious doctrine shall control to the extent required by the Constitution of the United States or the Constitution of this state or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 417, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

In 2009, a typographical error in subsection (2) was corrected at the direction of the co-counsel for the Joint Legislative Committee on Compilation, Revision and Publication of Legislation by substituting “ Section 79-11-101 et seq.” for “ Sections 79-11-101 et seq.” The correction was ratified by the Joint Committee at its July 22, 2010, meeting.

Application to religious corporations, generally, see § 79-11-401.

§79-11-405.
Nonprofit corporation to notify Secretary of State of determination, suspension or revocation of exemption from tax as Section 501(c)(3) organization.

A nonprofit corporation granted a determination of exemption from tax as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code shall notify the Secretary of State, in the form and manner prescribed by the Secretary of State, within thirty (30) calendar days of the determination of exemption.

If a nonprofit corporation’s exemption from tax as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code is suspended or revoked, the nonprofit corporation shall notify the Secretary of State of the suspension or revocation, in the form and manner prescribed by the Secretary of State, within thirty (30) calendar days of the suspension or revocation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2011, ch. 440, § 19, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2012.

Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, see 26 USCS § 501(c)(3).